California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 act constituting dishonesty or fraud; committed any act that, if committed by a permitholder, would be grounds for a suspension or revocation of the permit; misrepresented any material fact on the application; or, was convicted of an offense that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession, except that if the bureau determines that the applicant is otherwise suitable to be issued a permit, and granting the permit would not compromise public safety, the bureau shall conduct a thorough review of the nature of the crime, conviction, circumstances, and evidence of rehabilitation of the applicant, and shall evaluate the suitability of the applicant to be issued a permit based on the evidence found through the review.

(g) A permit shall not be issued unless it has been shown that the applicant meets one of the following residence requirements:

(1) For an individual, the applicant shall have resided in the State of California for not less than 90 days next preceding the filing of the application.

(2) For a partnership, the partner having the largest percentage interest in the partnership shall have resided in the State of California continuously for not less than 90 days next preceding the filing of the application.

(3) For a limited liability company or a corporation, the applicant shall be a domestic limited liability company or a domestic corporation or shall be qualified to transact business in the State of California as a foreign limited liability company or a foreign corporation at the time of filing the application.

(h) The bureau shall prescribe, amend, and repeal rules in accordance with law for the administration of this section.

(i) If the bureau denies an application, the bureau shall notify the applicant in writing. Within 30 days of service of the notice, the applicant may file a written request with the bureau for a hearing on the denial. Upon receipt of a timely filed request, the bureau shall request that the matter be set for hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 21.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19239.1.

(a) Except as provided for in subdivision (b), every household mover, as a condition precedent to the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, renewal, or continued maintenance of a permit, shall have on file with the bureau a current and valid Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance or Certification of Self-Insurance in the applicant’s or
 permitholder’s business name. A Certificate of Workers’ Compensation Insurance shall be issued and filed, electronically or otherwise, by an insurer duly licensed to write workers’ compensation insurance in this state. If reciprocity conditions exist, as provided in Section 3600.5 of the Labor Code, the bureau shall require the information deemed necessary to ensure compliance with this section.

(b) This section does not apply to an applicant or permitholder who has no employees, provided that the applicant or
 permitholder files a statement, under penalty of perjury, stating that, in its operations as a household mover, it does not employ any person in any manner so as to become subject to the workers’ compensation laws of this state.

(c) The workers’ compensation coverage certified to under subdivision (a) shall be effective until canceled. Cancellation shall require 30 days’ advance notice. A workers’ compensation insurer shall also report to the bureau a
 permitholder
 whose workers’ compensation insurance policy is canceled by the insurer if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The insurer has completed a premium audit or investigation.

(2) A material misrepresentation has been made by the insured that results in financial harm to the insurer.

(3) No reimbursement has been paid by the insured to the insurer.

(d) If, after filing the statement described in subdivision (b), the household mover becomes subject to the workers’
 compensation laws of this state, the household mover shall promptly notify the bureau that the household mover is withdrawing its statement under subdivision (b), and shall simultaneously file the certificate described in subdivision (a).

(e) The insurer, including the State Compensation Insurance Fund, shall report to the bureau the following information for any policy required under this section: name, license number, policy number, and dates that coverage is scheduled to commence and lapse,
 and cancellation date, if applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19239.2.

(a) The bureau shall accept a certificate required by Section 19239.1 as of the effective date shown on the certificate, if the certificate is received by the bureau within 90 days after that date, and shall reinstate the permit to which the certificate pertains, if otherwise eligible, retroactive to the effective date of the certificate.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the bureau shall accept the certificate as of the effective date shown on the certificate, even if the certificate
 is not received by the bureau within 90 days after that date, upon a showing by the permitholder, on a form acceptable to the bureau, that the failure to have a certificate on file was due to circumstances beyond the control of the permitholder. The bureau shall reinstate the permit to which the certificate pertains, if otherwise eligible, retroactive to the effective date of
 the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19239.3.

The bureau shall not issue or authorize the transfer of any permit under this chapter to any person or corporation against whom a final judgment has been entered and whose name has been transmitted to the bureau pursuant to Section 3716.4 of the Labor Code, unless that judgment has been satisfied or has been discharged in accordance with the bankruptcy laws of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19239.4.

(a) The failure of a permitholder to obtain or maintain workers’ compensation insurance coverage, if required under this chapter, shall result in the suspension of the permit by operation of law in accordance with the provisions of this section, but this suspension shall not affect, alter, or limit the status of the
 permitholder as an employer for purposes of Section 3716 of the Labor Code.

(b) The permit suspension imposed by this section is effective upon the earlier of either of the following:

(1) On the date that the relevant workers’ compensation insurance coverage lapses.

(2) On the date that workers’ compensation coverage is required to be obtained.

(c) A
 permitholder who is subject to suspension under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be provided a notice by the bureau that includes all of the following:

(1) The reason for the permit suspension and the effective date.

(2) A statement informing the permitholder that a pending suspension will be posted to the
 permit record for not more than 45 days prior to the posting of any permit suspension periods required under this article.

(3) The procedures required to reinstate the permit.

(d) Reinstatement may be made at any time following the suspension by showing proof of compliance as specified in Sections 19239.1 and 19239.3.

(e) With respect to an
 unpermitted individual acting in the capacity of a household mover who is not exempt from the provisions of this chapter, a citation may be issued by the bureau for failure to comply with this article and to maintain workers’ compensation insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19240.

(a) Each original application for issuance of a permit under this chapter shall be accompanied by a fee of five hundred dollars ($500). The holder of a permit issued by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to former Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5101) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code that is valid and effective as of July 1, 2018, shall not be required to submit a new application fee until the time the permitholder submits a new application. 

(b) An application for transfer of a permit shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150). 

(c) The fees described in this section shall be superseded by the fees adopted by the bureau on or before January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 19288. 

(d) All fees paid to the bureau under this chapter shall be deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19241.

(a) A household mover, under its permit, may also transport used office, store, and institution furniture and fixtures. The bureau shall not regulate the service, routes, or prices charged for the transportation of used office, store, and institution furniture and fixtures by a household mover. The bureau shall do nothing under this section that is in conflict
 with federal law as contained in Section 14501 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(b) If a household mover elects to transport used office, store, and institution furniture and fixtures under its household mover permit, all of the following apply:

(1) A permit is not needed from the Department of Motor Vehicles under the Motor Carriers of Property Permit Act (Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 34600) of
 the Vehicle Code) to conduct that transportation.

(2) The transportation is subject to the bureau’s safety and insurance requirements, except that the cargo insurance requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 19248 shall not apply.

(3) The household mover shall pay the applicable fees specified in this chapter.

(c) To exercise the
 election pursuant to this section, a household mover shall notify the bureau of the election or the revocation of that election by filing a notice with the bureau in the manner and on the form prescribed by the bureau. If a household mover does not elect to be subject to the provisions of this section or revokes a prior election to do so, the household mover
 shall comply with the provisions of the Motor Carriers of Property Permit Act when transporting used office, store, and institution furniture and fixtures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19242.

The bureau shall establish rules and regulations governing the notification to shippers of any delay in the delivery of goods beyond the date agreed to by the household mover and the shipper, if any, at the time the service was undertaken. All household movers shall observe such rules and regulations and the failure to do so is unlawful.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19243.

(a) The bureau may establish rules for the performance of any service of the character furnished or supplied by household movers. Every household mover shall observe these rules. Failure to do so is unlawful. A violation of the chapter or the bureau’s rules may be grounds for discipline.

(b) The
 bureau shall establish rules to authorize an electronic form of documents required by this chapter, consistent with the purpose of the document and if the household mover and the customer agree to the use of an electronic form.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19244.

It is unlawful for the owner of a household mover motor vehicle employing or otherwise directing the driver of the vehicle to permit the operation of the vehicle upon any public highway for compensation without first having obtained from the bureau a permit pursuant to this chapter or without first having complied with the vehicle identification requirements of Section 19236 or with the accident liability protection requirements of Section 19248.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19245.

(a) Except as provided in Section 19237, a household mover in compliance with this chapter has a carrier’s lien on used household goods and personal effects to secure payment of the amount specified in subdivision (b) for transportation and additional services ordered by the consignor. A carrier’s lien does not attach to food, medicine, or medical devices, items used to treat or assist an individual with a disability, or items used for the care of a minor child.

(b) (1) The amount secured by the carrier’s lien is the maximum total dollar amount for the transportation of the household goods and personal effects and any additional services, including any bona fide change order permitted under the rules and regulations administered by the bureau,
 that is set forth clearly and conspicuously in writing adjacent to the space reserved for the signature of the consignor and that is agreed to by the consignor before any goods or personal effects are moved from their location or any additional services are performed.

(2) The dollar amount for the transportation of household goods and personal effects and additional services shall not be preprinted on any form, shall be just and reasonable, and shall be established in good faith by the household mover based on the specific circumstances of the services to be performed.

(c) Upon tender to the household mover of the amount specified in subdivision (b), the carrier’s lien is extinguished, and the household mover shall release all household goods and personal effects to the consignee.

(d) A household mover may enforce
 the carrier’s lien on household goods and personal effects provided in this section except as to any goods that the household mover voluntarily delivers or unjustifiably refuses to deliver. The carrier’s lien shall be enforced in the manner provided in this section and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9601) of Division 9 of the Commercial Code for the enforcement of a security interest in consumer goods in a consumer transaction. To the extent of any conflict between this section and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9601) of Division 9 of the Commercial Code, this section shall prevail. Every act required in connection with enforcing the carrier’s lien shall be performed in good faith and in a commercially reasonable manner.

(e) The household mover shall provide a notification of disposition at least 30 days prior to any disposition to each consignor and consignee by personal delivery, or in the alternative, by first-class and certified
 mail, postage prepaid and return receipt requested, at the address last known by the household mover and at the destination address, and by electronic mail if an electronic mail address is known to the household mover. If any of the required recipients of notice are married to each other, and according to the household mover’s records, reside at the same address, one notice addressed to both shall be sufficient. Within 14 days after a disposition, the household mover shall provide to the consignors any surplus funds from the disposition and an accounting, without charge, of the proceeds of the disposition.

(f) A person having possession or control of household goods or personal effects, who knows, or through the exercise of reasonable care should know, that the household mover has been tendered the amount specified in subdivision (b), shall release the household goods and personal effects to the consignor or consignee, upon the request of the
 consignor or consignee. If the person fails to release the household goods and personal effects to the consignor or consignee, any peace officer, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 19237, may take custody of the household goods and personal effects and release them to the consignor or consignee.

(g) This section does not affect any rights, if any, of a household mover to claim additional amounts, on an unsecured basis, or of a consignor or consignee to make or contest any claim, and tender of payment of the amount specified in subdivision (b) is not a waiver of claims by the consignor or consignee.

(h) A person injured by a violation of this section may bring an action for the recovery of the greater of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or actual damages, injunctive or other equitable relief, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, and exemplary damages of not less than three
 times the amount of actual damages for a willful violation.

(i) A waiver of this section shall be void and unenforceable.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, this section exclusively establishes and provides for a carrier’s lien of a household mover on used household goods and personal effects to secure payment for transportation and additional services ordered by the consignor.

(k) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Consignor” means the person named in the bill of lading as the person from whom the household goods and personal effects have been received for shipment and that person’s agent.

(2) “Consignee” means the person named in the bill
 of lading to whom or to whose order the household mover is required to make delivery as provided in the bill of lading and that person’s agent.

(l) A document required by this section may be in an electronic form, if agreed upon by the household mover and the customer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 14.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19246.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Consignor” means the person named in the bill of lading as the person from whom the household goods and personal effects have been received for shipment and that person’s agent.

(2) “Consignee” means the person named in the bill of lading to whom or to whose order the household mover is required to make delivery as provided in the bill of lading and that person’s agent.

(b) Any household mover engaged in the business of transportation of used household goods and personal effects by motor vehicle over any public highway in this state shall provide each
 consignor with a completed copy of the notice set forth in this section. The notice shall be printed in at least 12-point type, except the title and first two paragraphs which shall be printed in boldface type, and provided to each consignor at least three days prior to the date scheduled for the transportation of household goods or personal effects. If the consignor requests services on a date that is less than three days before the scheduled date for transportation of the household goods or personal effects, the household mover shall provide the notice as soon as practicable, but in no event may the household mover commence any services until the consignor has signed and received a signed copy of the notice. The household mover shall obtain sufficient information from the consignor to fill out the form and shall include the correct maximum amount and a sufficient description of services that will be performed. The household mover shall retain a copy of the notice, signed by the consignor, for at least
 three years from the date the notice was signed by the consignor.

(c) Any waiver of the requirements of this section is void and unenforceable.

(d) For transportation services provided by a household mover, the “Not To Exceed” amount set forth in the notice and the agreement between the household mover and the consignor shall be the maximum total dollar amount for which the consignor may be liable for the transportation of household goods and personal effects and any additional services ordered by the consignor, including any bona fide change order permitted under the rules and regulations administered by the bureau, and agreed to by the consignor before any goods or personal effects are moved from their location or any other services are performed.

(e) A household mover may provide the notice set forth in this
 section either as a separate document or by including it as the centerfold of the informational booklet that the household mover is required to provide the consignor under the rules and regulations administered by the bureau. If the household mover provides the notice as part of the informational booklet, the booklet shall contain a tab that extends beyond the edge of the booklet at the place where the notice is included. The statement “Important Notice” shall be printed on the tab in at least 12-point boldface type. In addition, the statement “Customer Must Read And Sign The Important Notice In The Middle Of This Booklet Before A Move Can Begin” shall be set forth in 14-point boldface type on the front cover of the booklet.

(f) The notice provided the consignor shall be in the following form:
“IMPORTANT NOTICE ABOUT YOUR MOVE“IT IS VERY IMPORTANT THAT YOU ONLY AGREE TO A “NOT TO EXCEED” AMOUNT THAT YOU THINK IS A PROPER AND REASONABLE FEE FOR THE SERVICES YOU ARE REQUESTING. THE “NOT TO EXCEED” AMOUNT THIS MOVER IS REQUESTING IS $____________________ TO PERFORM THE FOLLOWING SERVICES:
____________________________________________________________
____________________________________________________________
___________________________________________________________.

 “IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THE “NOT TO EXCEED” AMOUNT LISTED OR THE DESCRIPTION OF SERVICES, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO REFUSE THE MOVER’S SERVICE AT NO CHARGE TO YOU.
“If you request additional or different services at the time of the move, you may be asked to complete a Change Order which will set forth your agreement to pay for additional fees for those newly requested
 services. If you agree to the additional charges on that Change Order, those charges may be added to the “NOT TO EXCEED” amount set forth above. If you do not agree to the amounts listed in the Change Order, you should not sign it and may refuse the mover’s services.“A mover cannot refuse to release your goods once you have paid the “NOT TO EXCEED” amount for the transportation of your goods and personal effects and any additional services that you have agreed to in writing. The “NOT TO EXCEED” amount must be reasonable.“A mover cannot, under any circumstances, withhold food, medicine, medical devices, items to treat or assist a disabled person, or items used for care of a minor child. A mover without a valid permit has no right to withhold your goods for any reason, including claims that you have not adequately paid for services rendered.“For additional information or to confirm whether a mover has a valid permit issued by the Division of Household Movers of the Bureau of Household Goods and Services, please call the Bureau toll free at:Insert toll-free number. “I have completed this form and provided the consumer (shipper) with a copy of this notice.
“Signed ________________________ Dated __________________
“I have been provided with a copy of this form.
“Signed
 ________________________ Dated _________________”
(g) Any document required by this section may be in an electronic form, if agreed upon by the household mover and the customer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 578, Sec. 34.   (SB 1483)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19247.

Every household mover shall add a prominent link to its Internet Web site that immediately directs all consumers to the bureau’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Accident Liability Protection [19248. - 19252.]

19248.

(a) The bureau, in granting permits pursuant to this chapter, shall require a household mover to procure, and continue in effect during the life of the permit, adequate protection against liability imposed by law upon the
 household mover for the payment of damages for personal bodily injuries, including death resulting therefrom, and property damage in the following amounts:

(1) Not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) on account of bodily injuries to or death of one person.

(2) Not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) on account of bodily injuries to or death of more than one person as a result of any one accident. The recovery of each person is subject to the limitation contained in paragraph (1).

(3) Not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for one accident resulting in damage to or destruction of property, other than property being transported by the
 household mover
 for any shipper or consignee, whether it is the property of one or more than one claimant.

(4) Not less than six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) on account of bodily injuries to or death of one or more persons and damage to or destruction of property, other than property being transported by the household mover for any shipper or consignee, whether it is the property of one or more than one claimant, in any one accident.

(b) The bureau may increase the minimum level of public liability and property damage protection required by this section if necessary to provide adequate
 protection.

(c) The bureau shall require all household movers to procure and continue in effect during the life of the permit cargo insurance in the amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). However, upon a showing before the bureau by a household mover that a lesser amount of cargo insurance adequately protects the public, and a finding by the bureau to that effect, the bureau may authorize the
 household mover to procure and continue in effect during the life of the permit the lesser amount of insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19249.

The protection required under this article shall be evidenced by the deposit of any of the following with the bureau covering each vehicle used or to be used under the permit applied for:

(a) A policy of insurance, issued by a company licensed to write such insurance in this state, or by nonadmitted insurers subject to Section 1763 of the Insurance Code, if the policies meet the rules and regulations administered by the bureau.

(b) A bond of a surety company licensed to write surety bonds in the state.

(c) Any evidence of the qualification of the household
 mover
 as a self-insurer as may be authorized by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19250.

With the consent of the bureau, a copy of an insurance policy, certified by the company issuing it to be a true copy of the original policy, or a photostatic copy of the policy, or an abstract of the provisions of the policy, or a certificate of insurance issued by the company issuing the policy, may be filed with the bureau in lieu of the original or a duplicate or counterpart of the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 15.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19251.

The protection against liability shall be continued in effect during the active life of the permit. The policy of insurance or surety bond shall not be cancelable on less than 30 days’ written notice to the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19252.

The bureau may establish such rules and regulations as are necessary to enforce this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Rates [19253. - 19257.]

19253.

(a) The bureau shall establish or approve maximum or minimum or maximum and minimum rates to be charged by household movers for the transportation of used household goods and personal effects and for accessorial service performed in connection with the transportation.

(b) In establishing or approving rates, the bureau shall account for the cost of all transportation service performed or to be performed, for any accessorial service performed or to be performed in connection
 with transportation, the value of the commodity transported, and the value of the equipment, facilities, and personnel reasonably necessary to perform the service. In determining rates, the bureau shall conduct a rate study and provide an opportunity for public comment. The bureau shall determine final rates based on the study and comments received during public review. 

(c) The bureau shall establish or approve no minimum rate for household movers unless it finds that the rate
 is at a sufficient level to allow safe operation upon the highways of the state and accounts for the cost of trained drivers and other reasonable expenses of operation of household movers.

(d) Until the operative date of rules or regulations of the bureau establishing or approving rates, the bureau shall enforce and administer the rates and rules set forth in the Public Utilities Commission’s Maximum Rate Tariff 4, as most recently amended
 as of July 1, 2018, by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19253.1.

A household mover shall not advertise, quote, or charge a rate or an amount for the transportation of used household goods and personal effects that is based on the amount of cubic feet or other volumetric unit measurement of those household goods and effects. In addition to any other remedy, a household mover that violates this section shall not be entitled to any compensation
 for the transportation of the household goods and effects and shall make restitution to the shipper of any compensation collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19253.2.

The bureau may establish procedures by which any household mover may charge or collect a greater rate than the maximum rate established under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19253.3.

The bureau shall make any rules that are necessary to the application and enforcement of the rates established or approved pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19254.

A household mover shall not directly or indirectly pay any commission to a shipper, consignee, or the employee thereof, or to the payer of the transportation charges, or refund, or remit to those persons, in any manner or by any device any portion of the rates or charges so specified, except upon authority of the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19255.

No household mover, no officer or agent of a household mover, and no person acting for or employed by a household mover shall, by means of known false billing, classification, weight, weighing or
 report of weight, or by any other device, assist, suffer, or permit any corporation or person to obtain transportation for any property between points within this state at rates less than the minimum rates or more than the maximum rates then established, approved, or administered by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19256.

No person, no corporation, and no officer, agent, or employee of a corporation shall, by means of false billing, false or incorrect classification, false weight or weighing, false representation as to the content or substance of a package, or false report or statement of weight, or by any other device or means, whether with or without the consent or connivance of a household mover, or any of its officers, agents, or employees, seek to obtain or obtain transportation for property at less than the minimum rates or charges or more than the maximum rates or charges
 established, approved, or administered by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19257.

No person, no corporation, and no officer, agent, or employee of a corporation, shall knowingly, directly or indirectly by any false statement or representation as to cost or value or the nature or extent of damage, or by the use of any false billing, bill of lading, receipt, voucher, roll, account, claim, certificate, affidavit, or deposition, or upon any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or entry, obtain or attempt to obtain any allowance, rebate, or payment for damage in connection with or growing out of the transportation of property subject to this chapter, or an agreement to transport property subject to this chapter, whether with or without the consent or connivance of a household
 mover, or any of its officers, agents, or employees. No household mover and no officer, agent, or employee of a household mover shall knowingly pay or offer to pay any such allowance, rebate, or claim for damage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reports, Records, and Inspections [19258. - 19262.]

19258.

(a) Each household mover maintaining an office or place of business within this state and offering intrastate service shall keep in that office or place of business all books, accounts, papers, and records required by the bureau to be kept within this state. Those books, accounts, papers, or records shall not be, at any time, removed from the state except upon such conditions as the bureau prescribes.
 Household movers performing intrastate service as household movers that do not maintain an office or place of business within this state shall make books, accounts, papers, and records pertaining to the intrastate service available to the bureau at its request at a place designated within this state for examination by the bureau, or in the alternative reimburse the bureau for the actual expense of examining those books, accounts, papers, or records at the place outside of the state where those records are kept.

(b) The bureau may require annual, periodic, or special reports to be filed by all household
 movers, may prescribe the manner and form in which reports shall be made, and may require specific answers to all questions upon which the bureau deems information to be necessary. The reports shall be under oath whenever the bureau so requires.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19259.

The bureau may require any household mover to file with it a true copy of any contract, agreement, or arrangement between the household mover and any other household mover in relation to any traffic affected by this
 chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19260.

The bureau may prescribe the forms of any accounts, records, and memoranda, including those pertaining to the movement of traffic and the receipt or expenditure of money, to be kept by household movers, and the length of time the accounts, records, and memoranda shall be preserved.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19260.1.

If the bureau has prescribed the forms of accounts, records, and memoranda to be kept by a household mover for any of its business, it is unlawful for any household mover to keep any accounts, records, or memoranda for that business other than those so prescribed or those prescribed by or under the authority of any other state or of the United States, excepting those
 accounts, records, or memoranda that are explanatory of and supplemental to the accounts, records, or memoranda prescribed by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19260.2.

The bureau and its authorized employees, representatives, and inspectors shall at all times have access to all lands, buildings, and equipment of household movers used in connection with the operation of their businesses as household movers in this state, and also all accounts, records, and memoranda, including all documents, books, papers, and correspondence kept or
 required to be kept by household movers, and may photocopy or electrostatically or photostatically reproduce at the bureau’s expense any of these accounts, records, memoranda, documents, books, papers, and correspondence at either the premises of the household mover or the offices of the bureau. A household mover may determine whether the copying or
 reproduction is done at its premises or at the offices of the bureau, and if copying or reproduction expenses are incurred by the household mover, the bureau shall, upon request, reimburse the household mover for the expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19260.3.

The employees, representatives, and inspectors of the bureau may inspect and examine any lands, buildings, equipment, accounts, books, records, and memoranda, including all documents, papers, and correspondence kept or required to be kept by household movers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19261.

Sections 19258 to 19260.3, inclusive, shall, to the extent deemed necessary by the bureau, apply to persons having control, direct or indirect, over or persons affiliated with any household mover.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19262.

(a) Every household mover shall furnish to the bureau annually, as specified by the bureau, a list, prepared under oath, of all vehicles used in transportation for compensation during the preceding year. The bureau shall furnish a copy of this list to the Department of the California Highway Patrol and to the
 household mover’s insurer, if the household mover’s accident liability protection is provided by a policy of insurance.

(b) If the household mover’s insurer informs the bureau that the household mover has failed to obtain insurance coverage for any vehicle reported on
 the list, the bureau may, in addition to any other applicable penalty provided in this chapter, for a first occurrence, suspend the household mover’s permit, or impose a fine, or both, and for a second or subsequent occurrence may suspend or revoke the permit, or impose a fine, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)